Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-140
Unclaimed witness fees; report to county board by clerk; when filed.

When witness fees are paid to the clerk of the district or county court in pursuance of judgment of the court and remain uncalled for by the parties entitled to the fees for the period of six months after they have been paid in, the clerk shall prepare a list, under oath, of the causes in which such fees have been paid and remain uncalled for, with the amounts in each cause and the date of judgment, and file the list with the county board of the respective county on the first Tuesday in January, April, July, and October in each year.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 6676;

C.S.1922, § 6213;

C.S.1929, § 77-2602;

R.S.1943, § 77-2401;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 271;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2401;

Laws 1989, LB 11, § 1.

County is entitled to any interest earned upon public funds in the hands of a county officer. Scotts Bluff County v. McHenry, 130 Neb. 717, 266 N.W. 586 (1936).

Section is constitutional. Douglas County v. Moores, 66 Neb. 284, 92 N.W. 199 (1902).